Washington statutes.
RCW 15.37.090

Subpoenas—Witness fees.

The director may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and/or the production of books, documents, and records in the county in which the person licensed under this chapter resides in any hearing affecting the authority or privileges granted by a license issued under the provisions of this chapter. Witnesses, except complaining witnesses, shall be entitled to fees for attendance and travel, as provided for in chapter 2.40 RCW as enacted or hereafter amended.

[ 1961 c 285 s 9.]